Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1509
Administrative services agreement; authorized.

The Public Employees Retirement Board may enter into an administrative services agreement with an organization authorized to conduct business in Nebraska and to administer public employee deferred compensation retirement plans. No such agreement shall be entered into unless the board determines that it will result in administrative economy and will be in the best interests of the state and its participating employees.

Laws 1979, LB 411, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 460, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 847, § 58.